test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VTA_AM_IND_waabam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTA - AM - waabmaa :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	    2	    3	    4       5       6       7
  #per      theme   neg     inan    persnum mod     periph
     
     #inan v obv neg forms might involve ini

     #this is extrapolated from book (p 287-294)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1SgO:   gwaabam
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2SgO: gwaabmin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigoo
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgO: gwaabmaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+2SgO: gwaabmig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgO: nwaabmaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1SgO: nwaabmig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2SgO: gwaabmigon
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1SgO: nwaabmigon
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgO:  waabmigon      #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1SgO:   gwaabmim
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1PlO:   gwaabmimi
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabminnim
     #waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabminim       #1sg v 2pl #book
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigoom
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+21Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaanaa 
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaawaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+21PlO: gwaabmignaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+2PlO: gwaabmigwaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Pl+3SgO: nwaabmaanaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1PlO: nwaabmignaa

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:   gwaabminaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1SgO:   gwaabminaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2SgO: gwaabminnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2SgO: gwaabminnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigoonaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigoonaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: gwaabmaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgO: gwaabmaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg+2SgO: gwaabmigba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Sg+2SgO: gwaabmigdig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: nwaabmaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgO: nwaabmaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg+1SgO: nwaabmigba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Sg+1SgO: nwaabmigdig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+4O:  waabmaan     #3obv v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+4+3SgO:  waabmigoon   #3sg v 3obv

     #2 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5), (4, 6), (4, 7)
     #                      (5, 6), (5, 7)
     #                      (6, 7)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2PlO: gwaabmignaawaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+21PlO: gwaabmignaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1PlO: nwaabmignaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlO:  waabmignaawaa      #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2SgO: gwaabmignaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2SgO: gwaabmignaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1SgO: nwaabmignaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1SgO: nwaabmignaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgO:  waabmignaaba      #0sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgO:  waabmignaadig     #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2SgO: gwaabmignan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1SgO: nwaabmignan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgO:  waabmignan      #0pl v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1SgO:   gwaabmimwaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1SgO:   gwaabmimwaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1PlO:   gwaabmimnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1PlO:   gwaabmimnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabminnimwaaba
     #waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabminimwaaba  #1sg v 2pl #book
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabminnimwaadig
     #waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabminimwaadig  #1sg v 2pl #book
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigoomwaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigoomwaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+21Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaamnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+21Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaamnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaawaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaawaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg+21PlO: gwaabmigminaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Sg+21PlO: gwaabmigminaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg+2PlO: gwaabmigwaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Sg+2PlO: gwaabmigwaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: nwaabmaamnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Pl+3SgO: nwaabmaamnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg+1PlO: nwaabmigminaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Sg+1PlO: nwaabmigminaadig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+21Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaanaanig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaawaag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl+21PlO: gwaabmignaanig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigwaag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Pl+3PlO: nwaabmaanaanig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl+1PlO: nwaabmignaanig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl+4O:   waabmaawaan      #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+4+3PlO:   waabmigwaan      #3obv v 3pl

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: gwaabmaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlO: gwaabmaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigbaniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigdigenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: nwaabmaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlO: nwaabmaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Pl+1SgO: nwaabmigbaniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Pl+1SgO: nwaabmigdigenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg+4O:   waabmaabniin     #3sg v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Sg+4O:   waabmaadgenan    #3sg v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+4+3SgO:   waabmigbaniin     #3obv v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+4+3SgO:   waabmigdigenan    #3obv v 3sg

     #3 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5, 6), (4, 5, 7), (4, 6, 7)
     #                      (5, 6, 7)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2PlO: gwaabmignaawaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2PlO: gwaabmignaawaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+21PlO: gwaabmigminaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+21PlO: gwaabmigminaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1PlO: nwaabmigminaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1PlO: nwaabmigminaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3PlO:  waabmignaawaaba      #0sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3PlO:  waabmignaawaadig      #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2PlO: gwaabmignaawaan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+21PlO: gwaabmignaanin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1PlO: nwaabmignaanin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3PlO:  waabmignaawaan      #0pl v 3pl

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2SgO: gwaabmignaabniin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2SgO: gwaabmignaadgenan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+1SgO: nwaabmignaabniin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+1SgO: nwaabmignaadgenan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgO:  waabmignaabniin    #0pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgO:  waabmignaadgenan   #0pl v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+21Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaamnaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+21Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaamnaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaawaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaawaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Pl+21PlO: gwaabmigminaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Pl+21PlO: gwaabmigminaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigwaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigwaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: nwaabmaamnaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Pl+3PlO: nwaabmaamnaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Pl+1PlO: nwaabmigminaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Pl+1PlO: nwaabmigminaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Pl+4O:   waabmaawaabniin       #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Pl+4O:   waabmaawaadgenan      #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+4+3PlO:   waabmigwaabniin       #3obv v 3pl (0sg too?)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+4+3PlO:   waabmigwaadgenan      #3obv v 3pl (0sg too?)

     #4 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5, 6, 7)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2PlO: gwaabmignaawaabniin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2PlO: gwaabmignaawaadgenan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+21PlO: gwaabmigminaabniin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+21PlO: gwaabmigminaadgenan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+1PlO: nwaabmigminaabniin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+1PlO: nwaabmigminaadgenan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3PlO:  waabmignaawaabniin    #0pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3PlO:  waabmignaawaadgenan   #0pl v 3pl

     #NEGATIVES BELOW
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1SgO:   gwaabmisii
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2SgO: gwaabmisnoon
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigoosii
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgO: gwaabmaasii
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Sg+2SgO: gwaabmigsii
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgO: nwaabmaasii
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Sg+1SgO: nwaabmigsii

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2SgO: gwaabmigsiin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1SgO: nwaabmigsiin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgO:  waabmigsiin      #0sg v 3sg
